src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON k36 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  heyggjur
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^GDEL S_M_SGGEN ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k37 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  skógvur
  k37e    ;
  k_flt37 ;

LEXICON k37e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGDAT_2 ;
 +N+Msc:^GVDEL S_M_SGGEN ;


LEXICON k_flt37
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:        S_M_PLNOM  ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_PLACC  ;
 +N+Msc:^GVDEL S_M_PLDATm ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_PLDAT  ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_PLGEN  ;

LEXICON k38e_2
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  súgvur
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:^VDEL  S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^VDEL  S_M_SGGEN ;


LEXICON k38 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  bógvur
  k38e    ;
  k_flt38 ;

LEXICON k38e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:^VDEL%>num MscObl_Flag ; ! bógnum
 +N+Msc:^VDEL S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt38
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k39 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  sjógvur
  k39e    ;
  k_flt39 ;

LEXICON k39e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGDAT_2  ;
 +N+Msc:^GDEL  S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:^GVDEL S_M_SGGEN    ;

LEXICON k_flt39
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;
 
LEXICON k40e_2
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  hógvur2
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT ; ! hógvinum
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>num MscObl_Flag ; ! hónum
 +N+Msc:^GVDEL S_M_SGGEN ; ! hós

LEXICON k40_3
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  skúgvur
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^GDEL  S_M_SGGEN ;
  k_flt40 ;

LEXICON k40 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  hógvur
  k40e    ;
  k_flt40 ;

LEXICON k40e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT ; ! hógvinum
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>num MscObl_Flag ; ! hónum
 +N+Msc:^GDEL S_M_SGGEN ; ! hóvs

LEXICON k_flt40
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k41 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  maður
  k41e    ;
  k_flt41 ;

LEXICON k41e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc+Sg+Nom:maður   DF_N_SGm ;
              :mann    k41_obl  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Dat:monn%>u DF_D_PL  ;

LEXICON k41_obl
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for oblique, hmm, needed?
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt41
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:menn S_M_PLNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:menn S_M_PLACC_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:mann S_M_PLGEN      ;

LEXICON k42 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  dagur
  k42e    ;
  k_flt42 ;

LEXICON k42e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^IUML%>i MscObl_Flag ; ! degi
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:^IUML%>num MscObl_Flag ; ! degnum
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt42
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k43 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  faðir
  k43e    ;
  k_flt43 ;

LEXICON k43e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
  +N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
  +N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGACC      ;
  +N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
  +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:faðirinum MscObl_Flag ;
  +N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGGEN      ;

LEXICON k_flt43
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
  +N+Msc:fedr   S_M_PLNOM ;
  +N+Msc:fedr   S_M_PLACC ;
  +N+Msc:fedr   S_M_PLDAT ;
  +N+Msc:fedr   S_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k44 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  bróðir, stem is ZERO
 +N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:bróðir     MscNom_Flag    ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:bróðirin   MscNom_Flag    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:bróður     MscObl_Flag     ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:bróðurin   MscObl_Flag     ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:bróður     MscObl_Flag     ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:bróðurinum MscObl_Flag     ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:bróðrinum  MscObl_Flag     ;
              +N+Msc:bróður     S_M_SGGEN_NULL ;
    k_flt44        ;

LEXICON k_flt44
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:brøður  S_M_PLNOM_NULL_NULL ; ! brøður
 +N+Msc:brøður  S_M_PLACC_NULL_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:brøðr S_M_PLDAT           ;
 +N+Msc:brøðr S_M_PLGEN           ;

LEXICON k45 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  spónur
  k45e    ;
  k_flt45 ;

LEXICON k45e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt45
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k46 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  fjørðu
 k46e ;
 k_flt46 ;

LEXICON k46e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA  S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt46
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA  S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k47 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  sonur
  k47e    ;
  k_flt47 ;

LEXICON k47e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt47
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k48 
 !! __@LEXNAME@__ for  hamar
  k48e    ;
  k_flt48 ;

LEXICON k48e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGGEN      ;

LEXICON k_flt48
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k49 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  verkur
  k49e    ;
  k_flt49 ;

LEXICON k49e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt49
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k50 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  skjøldur (non_poetic)
 +N+Msc:           S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:           S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLNOM      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^OEA S_M_PLGEN      ;

LEXICON k51 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  luður
 +N+Msc:ð  S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_SGGEN ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k52 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  primus
  k52e    ;
  k_flt52 ;

LEXICON k52e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN      ;

LEXICON k_flt52
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k53 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  aðal
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN      ;



!! !Feminines
! __________

!LEXICON kv1/2 not in use
!  kv1 ;
!  kv2 ;

LEXICON kv_flt0
  +N+Pl+Nom: # ;
  +N+Pl+Acc: # ;
  +N+Pl+Dat: # ;
  +N+Pl+Gen: # ;
  
!LEXICON kv_flt ! gætur, paradigm missing in dictionary
!  +N+Pl+Nom:%>ur # ;

LEXICON kv1 ! genta
  kv1e    ;
  kv_flt1 ;

LEXICON kv1e
 +N+Fem: W_F_SGNOM ;
 +N+Fem: W_F_SGOBL ;
