src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
genius:genius k52 ;
stradivarius:stradivarius k52 ;
nuntius:nuntius k52 ;
snórhógvur:snór#hógv k40 ;
hógvur:hógv k40 ;
hógvur:hógv k40e_2 ;
rossahógvur:rossa#hógv k40 ;
afturhógvur:aftur#hógv k40 ;
skúgvur:skúgv k40_3 ;
stúgvur:stúgv k40 ;
pípustúgvur:pípustúgv k40 ;
skjøldur:skjøldur k50 ;
friðarskjøldur:friðarskjøldur k50 ;
gætur:gætur kv_flt0 ;
banamaður:bana# k41 ;
skeggmaður:skegg# k41 ;
sáingarmaður:sáingar# k41 ;
sambandsmaður:sam#bands# k41 ;
drápsmaður:dráps# k41 ;
skutfestumaður:skut#festu# k41 ;
helvtarmenn:helvtar# k_flt41 ;
samrúmsmenn:sam#rúms# k_flt41 ;
luður:lu k51 ;
temuður:temu k51 ;
skarnsmuður:skarnsmu k51 ;
bruður:bru k51 ;
torragruður:torragru k51 ;
mótadukka:mótadukk kv1 ;
snobbisma:snobb#ism kv1 ;
javnaldra:javnaldr kv1 ;
nøta:nøt kv1 ;
langmotta:lang#mott kv1 ;
terradagur:terra#dag k42 ;
veiðidagur:veiði#dag k42 ;
mysingardagur:mysingar#dag k42 ;
búflutningsdagur:bú#flutnings#dag k42 ;
arbeiðsdagur:arbeiðs#dag k42 ;
mánudagur:mánu#dag k42 ;
gandadagar:ganda#dag k_flt42 ;
hundadagar:hunda#dag k_flt42 ;
óvitadagar:ó#vita#dag k_flt42 ;
ellidagar:elli#dag k_flt42 ;
ellisdagar:ellis#dag k_flt42 ;
spyrjus:spyrjus k52 ;
skriftafaðir:skrifta k43 ;
stjúkfaðir:stjúk k43 ;
barnfaðir:barn k43 ;
ættarfaðir:ættar k43 ;
forfaðir:for k43 ;
móðurfaðir:móður k43 ;
fornfeðrar:forn k_flt43 ;
aftan:aftan k53 ;
páskaaftan:páskaaftan k53 ;
dýrabiðidagsaftan:dýrabiðidagsaftan k53 ;
brúdleypsaftan:brúdleypsaftan k53 ;
skírhósaftan:skírhósaftan k53 ;
tollaksmessuaftan:tollaksmessuaftan k53 ;
bróðir: k44 ;
tvíburabróðir:tvíbura# k44 ;
sambróðir:sam# k44 ;
fosturbróðir:fostur# k44 ;
mansbróðir:mans# k44 ;
longubróðir:longu# k44 ;
spónur:spón k45 ;
sagispónur:sagispón k45 ;
telgispónur:telgispón k45 ;
saguspónur:saguspón k45 ;
sápuspónur:sápuspón k45 ;
stavsveðrar:stavsveður k_flt45 ;
mølheyggjur:mølheyggj k36 ;
eyrheyggjur:eyrheyggj k36 ;
álvheyggjur:álvheyggj k36 ;
svínastíggjur:svínastíggj k36 ;
loynistíggjur:loynistíggj k36 ;
streymfjørður:streymfjørð k46 ;
deyðavatnsfjørður:deyðavatnsfjørð k46 ;
lívsfjørður:lívsfjørð k46 ;
mittfjørður:mittfjørð k46 ;
stivlaskógvur:stivlaskógv k37 ;
fjaðraskógvur:fjaðraskógv k37 ;
rágummiskógvur+Err/Orth:rágummskógv k37 ;
slitskógvur:slitskógv k37 ;
skjátaroðskógvur:skjátaroðskógv k37 ;
ádamsskógvar:ádamsskógv k_flt37 ;
altarsskógvar:altarsskógv k_flt37 ;
purkuskógvar:purkuskógv k_flt37 ;
miðlingasonur:miðlingason k47 ;
pápasonur:pápason k47 ;
fostursonur:fosturson k47 ;
manssonur:mansson k47 ;
brøðrasynir:brøðrasyn k_flt47 ;
svínabógvur:svínabógv k38 ;
fastabógvur:fastabógv k38 ;
skerpibógvur:skerpibógv k38 ;
stýriborðsbógvur:stýriborðsbógv k38 ;
bakborðsbógvur:bakborðsbógv k38 ;
miðbógvur:miðbógv k38 ;
hamar:hamar k48 ;
øksarhamar:øksarhamar k48 ;
skúvhamar:skúvhamar k48 ;
brotasjógvur:brotasjógv k39 ;
skaðasjógvur:skaðasjógv k39 ;
stórsjógvur:stórsjógv k39 ;
eygnaverkur:eygnaverkj k49 ;
liðaverkur:liðaverkj k49 ;
beinverkur:beinverkj k49 ;
bróstverkur:bróstverkj k49 ;
sjóverkur:sjóverkj k49 ;
barnverkir:barnverk k_flt49 ;
føðingarverkir:føðingarverk k_flt49 ;
eftirverkir:eftirverk k_flt49 ;
barnsverkir:barnsverk k_flt49 ;
spýggjuverkir:spýggjuverk k_flt49 ;
pínuverkir:pínuverk k_flt49 ;
snjóløga:snjóløg kv1e ;
loynivitska:loynivitsk kv1e ;
svartsøla:svartsøl kv1e ;
ívera:íver kv1e ;
uppstøða:upp#støð kv1e ;
pjankus:pjankus k52e ;
alfaðir:al k43e ;
tórshamar:tórshamar k48e ;
hulduheyggjur:hulduheyggj k36 ;
høvuðverkur:høvuðverk k49 ;
langabbasonur:langabbason k47 ;
langommusonur:langommuson k47 ;
snjógvur:snjógv k37e ;
skriðusnjógvur:skriðu#snjógv k37e ;
ótrivasjógvur:ó#triva#sjógv k39 ;
rennisjógvur:renni#sjógv k39 ;
grunnsjógvur:grunn#sjógv k39 ;
ilskógvur:il#skógv k37 ;
mógvur:mógv k37e ;
heyggjamógvur:heyggja#mógv k37e ;
bláramógvur:blára#mógv k37e ;
undirmógvur:undir#mógv k37e ;
geldskúgvur:geld#skúgv k40_3 ;
súgvur:súgv k38e_2 ;
rennisúgvur:renni#súgv k38e_2 ;
alifjørður:ali#fjørð k46 ;
kyrrufjørður:kyrru#fjørð k46 ;
kaffimuður:kaffi#muð k51 ;
glanus:glanus k52 ;
krokus:krokus k52 ;
